Arkansas, session 2025, HB1298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-85-114 is amended to read as follows:
23-85-114. Payment of claims Payment-of-claims provision.
(a) There Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section,
there shall be a provision as follows:
“Payment of Claims: Indemnity for loss of life will be payable
in accordance with the beneficiary designation and the provisions respecting
such payment which may be prescribed herein and effective at the time of
payment. If no such designation or provision is then effective, such
indemnity shall be payable to the estate of the insured. Any other accrued
indemnities unpaid at the insured's death may, at the option of the insurer,
be paid either to such beneficiary or to such estate. All other indemnities
will be payable to the insured.”
(b) The Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section,
either of the following provisions, or either of them, may be included with
the foregoing provision subsection (a) of this section at the option of the
healthcare insurer:
*ANS021*
02-11-2025 09:49:38 ANS021

As Engrossed: H2/11/25 HB1298
(1) “If any indemnity of this policy shall be payable to the
estate of the insured, or to an insured or beneficiary who is a minor or
otherwise not competent to give a valid release, the insurer may pay such
indemnity, up to an amount not exceeding $............. (insert an amount
which shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000)), to any relative by
blood or connection by marriage of the insured or beneficiary who is deemed
by the insurer to be equitably entitled thereto. Any payment made by the
insurer in good faith pursuant to this provision shall fully discharge the
insurer to the extent of payment.”
(2) “Subject to any written direction of the insured in the
application or otherwise, all or a portion of any indemnities provided by
this policy on account of hospital, nursing, medical, or surgical services
may be paid, at the insurer's option and unless the insured requests
otherwise in writing not later than the time of filing proofs of such loss,
directly to the hospital or person rendering such services, but it is not
required that the service be rendered by a particular hospital or person.”
(c) A healthcare insurer shall pay a claim for any indemnity provided
by a health benefit plan on account of hospital, nursing, medical, or
surgical services directly to the healthcare provider that provided the
service for an out-of-network claim.
(d) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan or a
policy or contract for healthcare services offered, issued, renewed,
delivered, or extended in this state by a healthcare insurer; and
(ii) A health benefit program receiving state or
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program
established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-
61-1001 et seq., or any successor program.
(B) “Health benefit plan” includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Nonfederal governmental plans as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(C) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
02-11-2025 09:49:38 ANS021

As Engrossed: H2/11/25 HB1298
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan; or
(x) A long-term-care-only plan; and
(2)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity subject to the
insurance laws of this state or the jurisdiction of the Insurance
Commissioner that contracts or offers to contract to provide health insurance
coverage, including without limitation an insurance company, a hospital and
medical service corporation, a health maintenance organization, a self-
insured governmental or church plan in this state, or the Arkansas Medicaid
Program.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits.


SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-86-104 is amended to read as follows:
23-86-104. Blanket accident and health insurance — Payment of
benefits.
(a)(1) All Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section,
all benefits under any blanket accident and health insurance policy or health
benefit plan shall be payable to the person insured, to the designated
beneficiaries, or to his or her estate.
(2) However, if the person insured is a minor or mental
incompetent, the benefits may be made payable to the parent, guardian, or
other person actually supporting the minor or mental incompetent. If the
02-11-2025 09:49:38 ANS021

As Engrossed: H2/11/25 HB1298
entire cost of the insurance has been borne by the employer, the benefits may
be made payable to the employer.
(b)(1) However, except as provided under subsection (c) of this
section, the policy or health benefit plan may provide that all or any
portion of any indemnities provided by the policy or health benefit plan on
account of hospital, nursing, medical, or surgical services, at the
healthcare insurer's option, may be paid directly to the hospital or person
rendering the services, but the policy or health benefit plan may not shall
not require that the service be rendered by a particular hospital or person.
(2) Payment so made shall discharge made under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section discharges the healthcare insurer's obligation with
respect to the amount of insurance paid.
(c) A healthcare insurer shall pay a claim for any indemnity provided
by a health benefit plan on account of hospital, nursing, medical, or
surgical services directly to the healthcare provider that provided the
service for an out-of-network claim.
(d) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan or a
policy or contract for healthcare services offered, issued, renewed,
delivered, or extended in this state by a healthcare insurer; and
(ii) A health benefit program receiving state or
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program
established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-
61-1001 et seq., or any successor program.
(B) “Health benefit plan” includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Nonfederal governmental plans as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(C) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
02-11-2025 09:49:38 ANS021

As Engrossed: H2/11/25 HB1298
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan; or
(x) A long-term-care-only plan; and
(2)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity subject to the
insurance laws of this state or the jurisdiction of the Insurance
Commissioner that contracts or offers to contract to provide health insurance
coverage, including without limitation an insurance company, a hospital and
medical service corporation, a health maintenance organization, a self-
insured governmental or church plan in this state, or the Arkansas Medicaid
Program.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-86-112 is amended to read as follows:
23-86-112. Group accident and health insurance — Direct payment of
hospital or medical services.
(a) On Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section, on
request by the group policyholder, any group accident and health insurance
policy or health benefit plan may provide that all or any portion of any
indemnities provided by any policy or health benefit plan on account of
hospital, nursing, medical, or surgical services may be paid, at the
healthcare insurer's option, directly to the hospital or person rendering
such services, but the policy or health benefit plan may not shall not
require that the service be rendered by a particular hospital or person.
(b) Payment so made made under subsection (a) of this section shall
discharge the healthcare insurer's obligation with respect to the amount of
insurance paid.
(c) A healthcare insurer shall pay a claim for any indemnity provided
02-11-2025 09:49:38 ANS021

As Engrossed: H2/11/25 HB1298
by a health benefit plan on account of hospital, nursing, medical, or
surgical services directly to the healthcare provider that provided the
service for an out-of-network claim.
(d) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan or a
policy or contract for healthcare services offered, issued, renewed,
delivered, or extended in this state by a healthcare insurer; and
(ii) A health benefit program receiving state or
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program
established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-
61-1001 et seq., or any successor program.
(B) “Health benefit plan” includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Nonfederal governmental plans as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(C) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan; or
(x) A long-term-care-only plan; and
(2)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity subject to the
insurance laws of this state or the jurisdiction of the Insurance
02-11-2025 09:49:38 ANS021

As Engrossed: H2/11/25 HB1298
Commissioner that contracts or offers to contract to provide health insurance
coverage, including without limitation an insurance company, a hospital and
medical service corporation, a health maintenance organization, a self-
insured governmental or church plan in this state, or the Arkansas Medicaid
Program.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits.

/s/L. Johnson



























02-11-2025 09:49:38 ANS021